South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3274.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 150, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-150-65. The Lottery Commission may lawfully own, market, and regulate games of skill machines that may be activated by depositing cash into the machines and that allow skilled players to earn prizes, provided the Lottery Commission shall maintain ownership and control of these games of skill machines. A person eighteen years of age or older lawfully may play these machines and an establishment approved by the commission may lawfully possess these machines if the commission maintains ownership and control of these machines at all times. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----